Hawaii statutes.
§142-9 Quarantine between islands.
Live animals passing between the islands of the State may be quarantined as
provided by law, at either the port of shipment or of delivery, on good cause
shown to the department of agriculture at the port of entry nearest to the port
of shipment or delivery. [L 1882, c 34, §5; RL 1925, §615; RL 1935, §210; RL
1945, §1060; RL 1955, §20-10; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §22; am L 1961, c 132, §2;
HRS §142-9]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next